Maine, session 132, LD214.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 12 MRSA §6312, sub-§3, ¶B, as amended by PL 2011, c. 421, §2, is further
amended to read:
B. A passenger on board a vessel captained by an individual who possesses a valid
recreational fishing for-hire charter boat operator's license pursuant to subsection 5
section 6313;
Sec. 2. 12 MRSA §6312, sub-§3, ¶H, as enacted by PL 2011, c. 421, §2, is
amended to read:
H. A person who has employed the guiding services of an individual who possesses a
current guide license for tidewater fishing as provided by rule pursuant to section 12853
and a valid recreational fishing for-hire charter boat operator's license pursuant to
subsection 5 section 6313;
Sec. 3. 12 MRSA §6312, sub-§3-A is enacted to read:
3-A. Registration required for fishing for halibut. Notwithstanding subsection 3,
an individual fishing for halibut in the coastal waters of the State is required to register and
obtain recreational halibut tags.
Sec. 4. 12 MRSA §6312, sub-§5, as amended by PL 2011, c. 421, §2, is further
amended to read:
5. Recreational fishing operator's license. The following persons are eligible to hold
a recreational fishing operator's license issued by the commissioner:
A. A captain of a vessel licensed to carry passengers for hire for saltwater recreational
fishing;
B. A person operating a business that rents smelt fishing camps for saltwater
recreational smelt fishing; and
Page 1 - 132LR0356(04)

C. A person who owns a private dock, pier or wharf and makes that wharf available to
customers for the purpose of recreational fishing as part of a commercial enterprise;
and.
D. An individual who possesses a current guide license for tidewater fishing as
provided by rule pursuant to section 12853.
A person who holds a recreational fishing operator's license shall collect data from persons
who engage in saltwater recreational fishing and report the data to the commissioner as
specified by the commissioner by rule.
There is no fee for a recreational fishing operator's license.
Sec. 5. 12 MRSA §6313 is enacted to read:
§6313. For-hire charter boat operator's license
1. License required. A person may not engage in the activities authorized under this
section without a current for-hire charter boat operator's license.
2. Licensed activity. The holder of a for-hire charter boat operator's license may take
paying passengers recreationally fishing for fish in the coastal waters of the State on the
vessel identified on that for-hire charter boat operator's license. The license does not
authorize the holder or the holder's passengers to sell any fish taken under this license.
3. Agent fees. A fee may not be charged for a for-hire charter boat operator's license
under this section. A person seeking a license through an agent may be charged an agent
fee of $2. A person seeking a license through a publicly accessible online electronic system
for licensing may be charged an agent fee of $1. A person seeking a license at an office of
the department from a department employee may be charged an agent fee of $1.
4. Eligibility. A for-hire charter boat operator's license may be issued only to an
individual. A for-hire charter boat operator's license may be issued to an individual only if
the individual:
A. Possesses a valid United States merchant marine document issued by the United
States Coast Guard for an operator of uninspected passenger vessel or master or mate
captain's license; or
B. Holds a current guide license for tidewater fishing as provided by rule pursuant to
section 12853.
5. Violation. A person who violates this section commits a civil violation for which a
fine of not less than $100 nor more than $500 may be adjudged.
Sec. 6. Effective date. This Act takes effect January 1, 2026.
Page 2 - 132LR0356(04)